Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-839
Boundary bridge; bonds; submission at general election.

Upon request of the petitioners mentioned in section 39-837, the proposition to issue bonds may be submitted at the next general election after the presentation of the petition, upon giving notice as provided by section 39-838, in which case the petitioners shall not be required to execute any bond for the payment of the expenses of the election as provided by section 39-837.

Laws 1895, c. 45, § 3, p. 189;

R.S.1913, § 2998;

C.S.1922, § 2750;

C.S.1929, § 39-836;

R.S.1943, § 39-839.